Maine, session 132, LD1821.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA c. 19 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 19
FIREARM DEALER RESPONSIBLE BUSINESS PRACTICES ACT
§501. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Firearm Dealer Responsible Business
Practices Act."
§502. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. ATF. "ATF" means the federal Department of Justice, Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco,
Firearms and Explosives or its successor agency.
2. Dealer. "Dealer" has the same meaning as in section 395, subsection 1, paragraph
E.
3. Department. "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.
4. Firearm. "Firearm" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection
12-A.
5. Gun show. "Gun show" has the same meaning as in section 395, subsection 1,
paragraph G.
6. Law enforcement officer. "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in
Title 25, section 2801-A, subsection 5.
7. Office of Violence Prevention. "Office of Violence Prevention" means the office
established in Title 22, section 1427, subsection 1.
8. Straw purchase. "Straw purchase" means the purchase or attempted purchase by a
person of a firearm or ammunition for a firearm on behalf of or for the use of another person
known or unknown. "Straw purchase" does not include a purchase or attempted purchase
for the purposes of making a bona fide gift to a person who is not prohibited from
possessing or receiving the firearm or ammunition. For purposes of this subsection, a gift
is not a bona fide gift if the person offers or gives the purchaser a service or thing of value
to acquire the firearm for the person.
9. Transaction. "Transaction" means the transfer of ownership of a firearm from a
seller to a buyer.
§503. Security
1. Security measures required for firearm dealer. The department shall, by rule,
adopt standards specifying the minimum security requirements for dealers. Beginning July
1, 2026, a dealer shall comply with the standards. The standards may require dealers to
employ the following security measures:
Page 1 - 132LR1676(01)

A. An alarm system certified by a federal or state agency, a not-for-profit organization
or another entity specializing in security alarm standards approved by the department
for the purposes of this chapter. The rules must specify when the alarm system must be
capable of being monitored by a central station as well as provide monitoring of all
accessible openings and partial motion and sound detection at all other areas of the
premises;
B. Site hardening, including locks on doors and windows;
C. Video surveillance, including video recording devices at each point of sale and each
entrance and exit to the premises. The rules must require that any video surveillance
system allow recordings from both indoor and outdoor vantage points and must require
the maintenance of such recordings for a period of not less than 2 years; and
D. Other reasonable and effective security measures designed to reduce the risk of
theft at a dealer's business establishment.
2. Gun show applicability. The department shall specify, by rule, which of the
security measures in subsection 1 apply to gun shows.
§504. Employee vetting and training
1. Background checks on employees required. A dealer may not employ any person
to handle, sell or deliver firearms unless the person is 18 years of age or older and is not
prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law as determined by a
background check using the Federal Bureau of Investigation National Instant Criminal
Background Check System.
2. Employee training required. A dealer shall provide the training developed by the
department pursuant to subsection 3 to all new employees within 30 days of employment,
to all existing employees within 90 days of the effective date of this chapter and to all
employees annually thereafter.
3. Department to develop firearm dealer employee training. The department, with
assistance from the Office of Violence Prevention, shall develop and make available to
each dealer a training course on safe firearm transactions, including at a minimum the
following:
A. Federal and state laws governing firearm transactions;
B. How to recognize, identify, respond to and report straw purchases, illegal purchases
and fraudulent activity;
C. How to recognize, identify, respond to and report individuals who intend to use
firearms for unlawful purposes, including self-harm;
D. How to prevent, respond to and report theft or burglary of firearms and ammunition;
E. How to educate customers on gun safety practices, including but not limited to the
safe handling and storage of firearms and ammunition; and
F. Any other responsible business practice identified by the department.
4. Prohibition. A dealer and a dealer's employee may not participate in the sale or
disposition of firearms unless the dealer and dealer's employee have first received the
training required by this section.
Page 2 - 132LR1676(01)

5. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules setting forth minimum requirements
for the maintenance of records of the training required by this section.
§505. Maintenance of records
1. Record of purchase. A dealer shall establish and maintain a written or electronic
record of purchases, sales, acquisitions and dispositions, as required by 27 Code of Federal
Regulations, Section 478.125. The records must, at a minimum, include the make, model,
caliber or gauge, manufacturer's name and serial number of all firearms that the dealer
acquires or disposes of no later than one business day after the acquisition or disposal.
Physical copies of written records must be created at least monthly and stored in a secure
container designed to prevent loss by fire, theft or flood. Electronic records must be backed
up on an external server or over the Internet at the close of each business day.
2. Federal form required. A dealer shall retain all ATF Form 4473 records on their
premises for a minimum of 20 years, as required by 27 Code of Federal Regulations,
Section 478.124. The records must be stored in a secure container designed to prevent loss
by fire, theft or flood.
3. Record of inventory. A dealer shall account for all firearms acquired but not yet
disposed of in a monthly inventory check and shall maintain records of such checks in a
secure location.
4. Record of criminal firearm trace. A dealer shall maintain records of all criminal
firearm traces initiated by the ATF.
5. Records confidential. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
information contained in the records maintained under this section is confidential and may
not be disclosed to any person other than a law enforcement officer acting in the
performance of the officer's duties.
6. Inspection of records. A dealer shall permit law enforcement officers to inspect
the records required to be maintained under this section during regular business hours.
§506. Reporting
1. Transactions involving more than one firearm. A dealer shall report a transaction
involving more than one pistol or revolver to a law enforcement agency, as required by 27
Code of Federal Regulations, Section 478.126a.
2. Thefts and losses. A dealer shall report a theft or loss within 48 hours of discovery
to a law enforcement agency, as required by 27 Code of Federal Regulations, Section
478.39a.
§507. Compliance
1. Certification. A dealer shall, at least annually, certify to the department in a form
designed by the department by rule that the dealer is in compliance with the requirements
of this chapter.
2. Inspections. A dealer shall provide the department with full access to the dealer's
premises for an inspection. The department shall adopt rules authorizing an inspection by
the department of a dealer during regular business hours of the premises of the dealer to
determine compliance by the dealer with the requirements of this chapter.
Page 3 - 132LR1676(01)

3. Report. The department shall, beginning January 15, 2026, prepare and publish on
its publicly accessible website an annual report providing information on the number of
dealers inspected annually, the number of dealers in compliance with requirements of this
chapter, the number of dealers failing to comply with the requirements of this chapter and
other information that the department considers necessary and appropriate.
4. False certification; penalty. A dealer may not falsify information or contents in
the compliance report required by subsection 1. A person who violates this subsection
commits a Class C crime.
§508. Violations
1. Violation. Except as otherwise specified, a person may not violate this chapter or a
rule adopted pursuant to this chapter.
2. Penalties. The following penalties apply to violations of this section.
A. A dealer who violates any provisions in this chapter commits a civil violation for
which a fine of no less than $100 and no more than $500 may be adjudged.
B. A dealer who violates any provision of this chapter after having been adjudicated
as having committed one or more civil violations or for engaging in substantially
similar conduct to that contained in this subsection in another jurisdiction within the
previous 5-year period commits a civil violation for which a fine of no less than $500
and no more than $1,000 may be adjudged.
§509. Notice to purchasers upon sale of firearm
1. Notice required. Except as provided in subsection 2, a dealer shall conspicuously
post at each firearm point of sale a sign in a format to be prescribed by the department
containing the following notices:
A. "ENDANGERING THE WELFARE OF A CHILD IS A CRIME. IF YOU LEAVE
A FIREARM AND AMMUNITION WITHIN EASY ACCESS OF A CHILD, YOU
MAY BE SUBJECT TO A FINE, IMPRISONMENT OR BOTH.
KEEP FIREARMS AND AMMUNITION SEPARATE.
KEEP FIREARMS AND AMMUNITION LOCKED UP.
USE TRIGGER LOCKS, CABLE LOCKS, A LOCKBOX OR A SAFE.
PER STATE LAW, STORE STAFF MUST OFFER TO DEMONSTRATE THE USE
OF THESE SAFETY DEVICES.";
B. A notice prescribed by the department that informs purchasers of the background
check requirements of section 395 and the waiting period requirements of Title 25,
section 2016;
C. "Firearm suicide is the most common type of gun fatality. If you or a loved one is
experiencing distress or depression or is contemplating suicide, please call [insert the
telephone number for mental health assistance] to find your nearest Maine Crisis
Receiving Center or call the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline at [insert the
telephone number for lifeline]."; and
D. The names, addresses and phone numbers of businesses or instructors that offer
firearm safety courses.
Page 4 - 132LR1676(01)

2. Gun shows. The sign required by this section must be posted at all entrances of a
gun show.
3. Violation. A dealer or gun show operator who fails to post the notices required by
this section commits a civil violation for which a fine of no more than $200 may be
adjudged.
§510. Rulemaking
The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2012, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1991, c. 127, is amended
to read:
B. Offer to demonstrate to the purchaser the use of a trigger locking device, cable lock,
gun safe or lockbox; and